Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.060

Certificate of registration—Issuance, duration, renewal—Suspension.

(1) A certificate of registration shall be valid for two years and shall be renewed on or before the expiration date. The department shall issue to the applicant a certificate of registration upon compliance with the registration requirements of this chapter.

(2) If the department approves an application, it shall issue a certificate of registration to the applicant.

(3) If a contractor's surety bond or other security has an unsatisfied judgment against it or is canceled, or if the contractor's insurance policy is canceled, the contractor's registration shall be automatically suspended on the effective date of the impairment or cancellation. The department shall mail notice of the suspension to the contractor's address on the certificate of registration within two days after suspension using a method by which the mailing can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed.

(4) Renewal of registration is valid on the date the department receives the required fee and proof of bond and liability insurance, if sent by certified mail or other means requiring proof of delivery. The receipt or proof of delivery shall serve as the contractor's proof of renewed registration until he or she receives verification from the department.

(5) The department shall immediately suspend the certificate of registration of a contractor who has been certified by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order or a visitation order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320. The certificate of registration shall not be reissued or renewed unless the person provides to the department a release from the department of social and health services stating that he or she is in compliance with the order and the person has continued to meet all other requirements for certification during the suspension.

[ 2020 c 153 s 21; 2011 c 301 s 1; 2006 c 185 s 14; 2001 c 159 s 5. Prior: 1997 c 314 s 6; 1997 c 58 s 817; 1983 1st ex.s. c 2 s 19; 1977 ex.s. c 61 s 1; 1963 c 77 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 153 ss 21, 22, and 28: "Sections 21, 22, and 28 of this act take effect January 1, 2021." [ 2020 c 153 s 29.]

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.

Effective dates—Intent—1997 c 58: See notes following RCW 74.20A.320.